Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-229.02
Real property; acquisition.

A city of the primary class may acquire additional real property by gift, agreement, purchase, exchange, or condemnation if such additional real property is needed for the purpose of moving and establishing thereon buildings, structures, or other appurtenances which are situated on real property acquired by the city for a public purpose. The city may make agreements for the exchange of property, to make allowances for differences in the value of the properties being exchanged, and to move or pay the cost of moving buildings, structures, or other appurtenances.

Laws 1967, c. 56, § 3, p. 193;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 46.